Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.160

General application of laws to code cities.

A code city organized or reorganized under this title shall have all of the powers which any city of any class may have and shall be governed in matters of state concern by statutes applicable to such cities in connection with such powers to the extent to which such laws are appropriate and are not in conflict with the provisions specifically applicable to code cities.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.160.]